Washington statutes.
RCW 18.225.170

Retired active licenses—Rules.

The secretary of the department of health shall promulgate rules relating to issuance of a retired active license under RCW 18.130.250 for mental health counselors, marriage and family therapists, advanced social workers, and independent clinical social workers.

[ 2012 c 58 s 1.]